Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-1917
Commission; duties; rules and regulations.

(1) The commission shall:

(a) Supervise the issuance of public information concerning the Nebraska Opportunity Grant Act; and

(b) Establish a reasonable and fair appeal procedure for students adversely
affected by the actions of the commission or an eligible postsecondary educational
institution in the distribution of funds or granting of awards pursuant to
the act.

(2) The commission may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations necessary
to carry out the act, including such rules and regulations for maintenance
of fiscal controls and fund accounting procedures as may be necessary to assure
proper disbursement of funds and to assure that the eligible postsecondary
educational institutions, as agents of the commission, have complied with
the act. Such rules and regulations shall be developed in cooperation with
representatives of eligible postsecondary educational institutions and shall
be designed, to the extent consistent with requirements of the act, to minimize
the administrative burden on the eligible postsecondary educational institutions
and the commission.

Laws 2003, LB 574, § 17;

Laws 2010, LB956, § 15.